Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. Regional Resource Centers.

Administrative Code. —

For regional resource centers, see 4 AAC 66.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Regional resource centers, including Southeast Regional Resource Center created pursuant to AS

14.12.150

—

14.12.180

are not public procurement units, as that term is defined at AS

36.30.790

. The department is not exempt from complying with the requirements of the state procurement code when it seeks to obtain the educational services that regional resources centers may be able to provide. April 4, 1994, Op. Att’y Gen.

Southeast Regional Resource Center (SERRC) is neither a local educational agency nor an intermediate educational agency. It cannot serve as the fiscal agent for a consortium of districts under the Eisenhower Math and Science Program. A change in SERRC’s status to imbue it with more governmental connection or authority would represent a significant change requiring legislative action. The department should give careful consideration to the policy and legal implications before supporting such a change. July 20, 1995, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.12.150.
Establishment and purpose.

The districts of the state public school system may join together to establish regional resource centers to provide services, including the following: accounting, payroll, and other fiscal; media; instructional support; bilingual-bicultural educational; in-service and staff development; student; diagnostic; school management; and school board member training.

A regional resource center established under (a) of this section shall be governed by a board consisting of one representative from each participating district. The representative shall be appointed by the governing board of that district. The term of office of regional resource center board members shall be two years, beginning July 1 of each calendar year. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as original appointment.

Regional resource center boundaries shall be established by the board on recommendation of the commissioner of education and early development in the following seven regions of the state: southcentral and the Aleutian Chain, western, northwest, Bristol Bay, interior, southeast, and Kodiak. A district may not be included in more than one regional resource center area.

Regional resource center boards may receive and expend both public and private funds to operate a regional resource center.

Employees of the regional resource centers are not in the state service and are not subject to AS 39.25 (State Personnel Act). However, all regional resource center employees shall be members of either the teachers’ retirement system (AS 14.25) or the public employees’ retirement system (AS 39.35).

History.

(§ 2 ch 236 SLA 1976; am § 11 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” in (c) of this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For regional resource centers, see 4 AAC 66.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), deleted “but not limited to” following “provide services, including”.

Sec. 14.12.160.
Regional resource center board grant program; eligibility.

The department may make grants to regional resource center boards that qualify for the grants under the criteria set out in (b) of this section and regulations adopted by the department.

To qualify for a grant under (a) of this section, a regional resource center board shall

be organized under the provisions of AS

14.12.150

;

adopt bylaws for its operation;

provide the department with a plan of operation including the following elements:

the bylaws adopted for its operation;

a list of participating districts, number of students, and professional staff to be served;

a schedule of funds available from federal, state, local, and private sources;

a description of the services and programs to be offered;

a description of the method by which these services and programs will be evaluated;

other information that may be required by the department by regulation;

comply with applicable regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 236 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (b)(3), deleted “but not limited to” preceding “the following elements”.

Sec. 14.12.170.
Districts.

For purposes of AS

14.12.150

—

14.12.180

, regional educational attendance areas shall be considered districts.

History.

(§ 2 ch 236 SLA 1976; am § 11 ch 94 SLA 1980)

Sec. 14.12.180.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations necessary to implement the provisions of AS

14.12.150

—

14.12.170

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 236 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For regional resource centers, see 4 AAC 66.